Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.190

Location of practice—Penalty—Placebound clients.

It is a violation of this chapter for any person to engage in the commercial practice of cosmetology, hair design, barbering, esthetics, master esthetics, or manicuring, except in a licensed salon/shop or the home, office, or other location selected by the client for obtaining the services of a personal service operator, or with the appropriate individual license when delivering services to placebound clients. Placebound clients are defined as persons who are ill, disabled, or otherwise unable to travel to a salon/shop.

[ 2015 c 62 s 9; 2013 c 187 s 9; 1991 c 324 s 20.]